test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-veis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - veis: # Noun 108 'eng /est nuga/fin' - full paradigm
     veis+N+Sg+Nom: veis
     veis+N+Sg+Gen: veis
     veis+N+Sg+Par: veisõ
     veis+N+Sg+Dat: veisõn
     veis+N+Sg+Ins: veisõks
     veis+N+Sg+Ill: veisõ
     veis+N+Sg+Ela: veisõst
     veis+N+Pl+Nom: vēšõd
     veis+N+Pl+Gen: vēšõd
     veis+N+Pl+Par: vēšidi
     veis+N+Pl+Dat: vēšõdõn
     veis+N+Pl+Ins: vēšõdõks
     veis+N+Pl+Ill: vēšiz
     veis+N+Pl+Ela: vēšist
